Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska50-445
State-Tribal Relations Committee; members.

The State-Tribal Relations Committee is hereby established as a special legislative committee with the intent of fostering better relationships between the state and the federally recognized Indian tribes within the state. The Executive Board of the Legislative Council shall appoint seven members of the Legislature to the committee. The appointments shall be based on interest and knowledge. The chairperson and vice-chairperson of the State-Tribal Relations Committee shall also be designated by the executive board. All appointments shall be made within the first six days of the legislative session in odd-numbered years. Members shall serve two-year terms corresponding with legislative sessions and may be reappointed for consecutive terms. The committee shall meet as necessary to, among other things, consider, study, monitor, and review legislation that impacts state-tribal relations issues and to present draft legislation and policy recommendations to the appropriate standing committee of the Legislature.

Laws 2007, LB34, § 1.